Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2390
Deposit of trust receipt authorized.

Any bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution pledging securities to secure deposits of public money or public funds pursuant to section 77-2389 may deposit, with the approval of the governing authority, the securities in a federal reserve bank or a bank, federal home loan bank, capital stock financial institution, qualifying mutual financial institution, or trust company approved by the governing authority, and take for the same a trust receipt in the form of and executed in the manner approved by the governing authority. When the transaction has been approved, the bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution may deposit the trust receipt in lieu of the securities evidenced by the trust receipt.

Laws 1996, LB 1274, § 5;

Laws 2000, LB 932, § 40;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 85.